Utah statutes.
41-1a-609.   Terminal rental adjustment clauses.
(1)  As used in this section, "terminal rental adjustment clause" means a
provision of an agreement that permits or requires the rental price to be
adjusted upward or downward by reference to the amount realized by the lessor
under the agreement upon sale or other disposition of the property.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a motor vehicle or trailer
lease agreement that is subject to a terminal rental adjustment clause does
not create a sale or security interest.
(3)  The provisions of this section do not affect:
(a)  the rights and obligations of a valid security interest under this
chapter; or
(b)  the calculation of sales and use tax payable under Title 59, Chapter 12,
Sales and Use Tax Act.
